Utah statutes.
16-6a-810.   Vacancy on board.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, if a vacancy occurs on a board
of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of
directors:
(a)  the voting members, if any, may fill the vacancy;
(b)  the board of directors may fill the vacancy; or
(c)  if the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of
the board of directors, the remaining directors may fill the vacancy by the
affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), unless otherwise provided in the bylaws,
if the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of
voting members:
(a)  if one or more of the remaining directors were elected by the same voting
group of voting members:
(i)  only the directors elected by the same voting group of voting members are
entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by directors; and
(ii)  the directors elected by the same voting group of voting members may
fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors
remaining in office; and
(b)  only that voting group is entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is
filled by the voting members.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) and unless otherwise provided in the
bylaws, only the directors elected by the same voting group of directors are
entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if:
(a)  the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of
directors; and
(b)  any persons in that voting group remain as directors.
(4)  Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, if a vacant office was held by
an appointed director, only the person who appointed the director may fill the
vacancy.
(5) (a)  If a vacant office was held by a designated director, as provided in
Subsection 16-6a-804(5), the vacancy shall be filled as provided in the
bylaws.
(b)  In the absence of an applicable bylaw provision, the vacancy may not be
filled by the board.
(6)  A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date by reason of a
resignation effective at a later date under Subsection 16-6a-807(2) or
otherwise, may be filled before the vacancy occurs, but the new director may
not take office until the vacancy occurs.
